Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-892
Labeling of promotional material.

Promotional material may be displayed or delivered to prospective purchasers which display amenities provided they are labeled: (a) Must Be Built or (b) Need Not Be Built.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 68.